District of Columbia statutes.
28-4522

Prohibitions.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any individual, corporation, joint stock company, business trust, partnership, business association, or other legal entity engaged in business within the District of Columbia, for the purpose of injuring competitors or destroying competition, to sell, offer for sale, or advertise for sale cigarettes for less than cost, either at retail or wholesale, or to give, offer to give, or advertise an intent to give away any cigarettes for the purpose of injuring competitors or destroying competition.

(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and § 28-4521(2), the presumptive wholesale markup of 2% may be reduced by 1/10 of 1% for the wholesale sale of cigarettes on a cash and carry basis.

Mar. 22, 1994, D.C. Law 10-89, § 2(b), 41 DCR 489
This section is referenced in § 28-4521, § 28-4523, and § 28-4526.
1981 Ed., § 28-4522.